Washington statutes.
RCW 1.16.065

"Officer."

Whenever any term indicating an officer is used it shall be construed, when required, to mean any person authorized by law to discharge the duties of such officer.

[Code 1881 s 755; 1854 p 221 s 501; RRS s 147.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was formerly a part of RCW 42.04.010. It first appeared in "An Act to regulate the practice and proceedings in civil actions" (1854 p 221 s 501), as part of chapter LIV, "Construction". It also appeared as Code of 1881 s 755 in chapter LXVII, "Of Construction", as part of the code of civil procedure.

Criminal code, officer defined: RCW 9A.04.110.